Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201779-1065
Financial support to school districts; adjustments authorized; records.

The State Department of Education shall adjust payments of state funds provided under Chapter 79 or federal funds provided under federal law to school districts which, after final determination, received funds not equal to the appropriate allocation for the previous school fiscal year such that the district will receive the funds to which it was finally determined to be entitled. If the total adjustment cannot be made from the funds to be provided in the current school fiscal year, the adjustment shall be prorated, with additional adjustments made to payments for future school fiscal years. The department shall maintain an accurate account and a record of the reasons the adjustments were made and the amount of such adjustments.

Laws 1976, LB 903, § 10;

Laws 1987, LB 367, § 68;

Laws 1990, LB 1059, § 41;

Laws 1991, LB 511, § 63;

Laws 1992, LB 245, § 68;

Laws 1992, LB 1001, § 30;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1369;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 711;

Laws 1997, LB 710, § 20;

Laws 1998, Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 38;

Laws 2017, LB512, § 17.